test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-manitswma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - manitsõma2: # Verb (61) manitsõma2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
# 60, 61
     manitsõma+V+Inf/mA: manitsõma
     manitsõma+V+Inf: [manitsaq, manidaq]
     manitsõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: [manitsnuq, maninuq]
     manitsõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [manitsõt, manitsõtu, manit, manitu]

     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: manidsõ
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [manitsõt, manitsõdõq]
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: manitsõs
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: manitsõmiq
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: manitsõtiq
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: manitsõsõq
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: manidsõ
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: manidsi
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [manitsit, manidsiq, manitsidõq]
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: manitsʼ
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: manitsimiq
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: manitsitiq
     manitsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [manidsiq, manitsivaq]

     manitsõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: manitsõda
     manitsõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: manitsõdas

     manitsõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: manitsõv

     manitsõma+V+Jus: [manitskuq, maniguq]
